apertium-bre.bre.dix
    <pardef n="labour/at__vblex">
      <e><p><l>at</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>et</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ez</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>omp</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>it</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ont</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>er</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>emp</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ec’h</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ent</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ed</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>jon</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jout</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jomp</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>joc’h</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jont</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jod</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>in</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>imp</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ot</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oc’h</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>int</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>or</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fen</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fes</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fe</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>femp</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fec’h</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fent</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fed</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="laka/at__vblex">
      <e><p><l>at</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>et</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ez</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>omp</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>it</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ont</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>er</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>en</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>emp</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ec’h</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ent</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ed</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>jon</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jout</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jomp</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>joc’h</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jont</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jod</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>in</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>y</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>io</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>imp</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ot</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oc’h</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>int</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>or</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fen</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fes</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fe</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>femp</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fec’h</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fent</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fed</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>jen</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>jes</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>je</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>jemp</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>jec’h</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>jent</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>jed</l><r>at<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
	  </pardef>

    <e lm="adlakaat"><i>adlaka</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="arbennikaat"><i>arbennika</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="barrekaat"><par n="initial-b"/><i>arreka</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="blotaat"><par n="initial-b"/><i>lota</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="buanaat"><par n="initial-b"/><i>uana</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="dedostaat"><par n="initial-d"/><i>edosta</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="digalonekaat"><par n="initial-d"/><i>igaloneka</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="divyezhekaat"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ivyezheka</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="dreistazasaat"><par n="initial-d"/><i>reistazasa</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="enlakaat"><i>enlaka</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="freskaat"><i>freska</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gorrekaat"><par n="initial-g"/><i>orreka</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gwashaat"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>asha</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hiraat"><i>hira</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kadarnaat"><par n="initial-k"/><i>adarna</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kasaat"><par n="initial-k"/><i>asa</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="klokaat"><par n="initial-k"/><i>loka</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kretaat"><par n="initial-k"/><i>reta</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lakaat anavezout"><i>laka</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/><p><l><b/>anavezout</l><r><g><b/>anavezout</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="lakaat da dalvezout"><i>laka</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/><p><l><b/>da<b/>dalvezout</l><r><g><b/>da<b/>dalvezout</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="lec’helaat" r="LR"><i>lec’hela</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="naetaat"><i>naeta</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="personelaat"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ersonela</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="romanekaat"><i>romaneka</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="steuñvekaat"><i>steuñveka</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="trenkaat" r="LR"><par n="initial-t"/><i>renka</i><par n="laka/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="adlakat"><i>adlak r="LR"</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bannikat"><par n="initial-b"/><i>annik</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="begeliat"><par n="initial-b"/><i>egeli</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="brañsellat" r="LR"><par n="initial-b"/><i>rañsell</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="butunat" r="LR"><par n="initial-b"/><i>utun</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="c’hwennat"><i>c’hwenn</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="c’hwitellat"><i>c’hwitell</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gagouilhat"><par n="initial-g"/><i>agouilh</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gwriat"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>ri</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kenlabourat"><par n="initial-k"/><i>enlabour</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kignat"><par n="initial-k"/><i>ign</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="krignat"><par n="initial-k"/><i>rign</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="labourat"><i>labour</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lakat"><i>lak</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lammat"><i>lamm</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="marvailhat" r="LR"><par n="initial-m"/><i>arvailh</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="palat"><par n="initial-p"/><i>al</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pignat"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ign</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pigosat"><par n="initial-p"/><i>igos</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
  	<e lm="pilat"><par n="initial-p"/><i>il</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rastellat"><i>rastell</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="roulat"><i>roul</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ruzikat"><i>ruzik</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="staotat" r="LR"><i>staot</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="strinkat" r="LR"><i>strink</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lakaat diaes"><i>laka</i><par n="labour/at__vblex"/><p><l><b/>diaes</l><r><g><b/>diaes</g></r></p></e>
